Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.420

Conversion of domestic association to limited cooperative association—Procedure.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a domestic association organized under this chapter may convert to a limited cooperative association pursuant to RCW 23.100.1302 through 23.100.1314.

(2) This section does not apply to a domestic association organized for the purpose of generating, purchasing, selling, marketing, transmitting, or distributing electric energy.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1404.]

NOTES:

Uniformity of application and construction—Savings—2019 c 37: See RCW 23.100.1501 and 23.100.1503.